Massachusetts, session 194th, S219.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 25C subsection (f) of Chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “necessary”, the following 
words:- 
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this chapter, a licensee authorized 
to sell alcoholic beverages at retail for off-premises consumption may issue coupons to 
customers for the purchase of alcoholic beverages at prices below current posted prices provided 
that the final cost to a customer is not below the retailer’s invoiced cost after applicable 
discounts.